District of Columbia statutes.
19-604.06

Transfer on death deed revocable.

A transfer on death deed is revocable under § 19-604.11 even if the deed or another instrument contains a contrary provision.

History

Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 2(b), 59 DCR 13606